rm-deriv-cmp.twol
Alphabet

%<adj%>
%<comp%>
%<sup%>
%<n%>
%<prsprc%> 
%<prtprc%> 
%<prfprc%> 
%<cmp%>
%<rcmpnd%>

%<foc%_son%>

%<der%_car%>
%<der%_caus%>
%<der%_dimin%>
%<der%_inchl%>
%<der%_keahtta%>
%<der%_lasj%>
%<der%_sasj%>
%<der%_vuota%>

%<der%_a%>
%<der%_adv%>
%<der%_aadv%>
%<der%_dimin%>
%<der%_nomact%>
%<der%_nomag%>
%<der%_passl%>
%<der%_passs%>
%<der%_adda%>
%<der%_ahtti%>
%<der%_alla%>
%<der%_amoš%>
%<der%_asti%>
%<der%_at%>
%<der%_d%>
%<der%_dáfot%>
%<der%_eamoš%>
%<der%_easti%>
%<der%_geahtes%>
%<der%_goahti%>
%<der%_h%>
%<der%_halla%>
%<der%_heapmi%>
%<der%_huhtti%>
%<der%_huvva%>
%<der%_j%>
%<der%_jagáš%>
%<der%_l%>
%<der%_las%>
%<der%_laš%>
%<der%_lágan%>
%<der%_lágaš%>
%<der%_meahttun%>
%<der%_muš%>
%<der%_nammasaš%>
%<der%_nuolus%>
%<der%_náittot%>
%<der%_saš%>
%<der%_seagat%>
%<der%_st%>
%<der%_stuvva%>
%<der%_stávval%>
%<der%_supmi%>
%<der%_suttat%>
%<der%_t%>
%<der%_upmi%>
%<der%_veara%>
%<der%_viđá%>
%<der%_vuohta%>
%<der%_ár%>

;				! end of Alphabet

Sets

Cmp =
%<cmp%>
%<rcmpnd%>
;

Adj = 
%<adj%>
;

N = 
%<n%> 
;

Prc = 
%<prsprc%> 
%<prtprc%> 
%<prfprc%> 
;

UnhandledFoc = 
%<foc%_son%>
;

Derivations =
%<der%_a%>
%<der%_adv%>
%<der%_aadv%>
%<der%_dimin%>
%<der%_nomact%>
%<der%_nomag%>
%<der%_passl%>
%<der%_passs%>
%<der%_adda%>
%<der%_ahtti%>
%<der%_alla%>
%<der%_amoš%>
%<der%_asti%>
%<der%_at%>
%<der%_d%>
%<der%_dáfot%>
%<der%_eamoš%>
%<der%_easti%>
%<der%_geahtes%>
%<der%_goahti%>
%<der%_h%>
%<der%_halla%>
%<der%_heapmi%>
%<der%_huhtti%>
%<der%_huvva%>
%<der%_j%>
%<der%_jagáš%>
%<der%_l%>
%<der%_las%>
%<der%_laš%>
%<der%_lágan%>
%<der%_lágaš%>
%<der%_meahttun%>
%<der%_muš%>
%<der%_nammasaš%>
%<der%_nuolus%>
%<der%_náittot%>
%<der%_saš%>
%<der%_seagat%>
%<der%_st%>
%<der%_stuvva%>
%<der%_stávval%>
%<der%_supmi%>
%<der%_suttat%>
%<der%_t%>
%<der%_upmi%>
%<der%_veara%>
%<der%_viđá%>
%<der%_vuohta%>
%<der%_ár%>
%<der%_car%>
%<der%_caus%>
%<der%_dimin%>
%<der%_inchl%>
%<der%_keahtta%>
%<der%_lasj%>
%<der%_sasj%>
%<der%_vuota%>
;

HandledDerivations =
!%<der%_at%>
!%<der%_halla%>
!%<der%_l%>
!%<der%_alla%>
%<der%_passl%>
%<der%_passs%>
%<der%_goahti%>
%<der%_aadv%>
%<der%_dimin%>
!%<der%_vuohta%>
!%<der%_ahtti%>
!%<der%_h%>
!%<der%_d%>
!%<der%_laš%>
!%<der%_st%>
!%<der%_nomag%>
%<der%_nomact%>
;

;				! end of Sets

Definitions

UnhandledDerivations = Derivations - HandledDerivations ;

;				! end of Definitions

Rules

! "Don't allow compounds until we've fixed trimming, choosing-lexicalised-over-compounds, sem-tags-being-messed-up-in-compounds, etc. etc."
! V /<= _ ; where V in Cmp ;

"Only allow those derivations that we've made sure survive translation"
: /<= _ UnhandledDerivations ;

"Don't allow derivations as left-compounds"
: /<= _ Derivations :* Cmp ;

! "Don't allow more than two left-compounds -- Makefile.am handles this"
! : /<= _ Cmp :* Cmp :* Cmp ;

!"Don't allow adjective-noun compounds"
!: /<= _ Adj :* N ;

"Don't allow +Foc/son"
: /<= _ UnhandledFoc ;

"Don't allow compounds where first part is noun and second is der_nomact"
: /<= _ N :* %<der%_nomact%> ;

"Don't allow comp or sup + der_sti"
: /<= _ [ %<comp%> | %<sup%> ] :* %<der%_aadv%> ; 

"Don't allow noun-participle compounds"
: /<= _ [ Adj | N ] :* Prc ;

"Don't allow imperative in 1st person"
: /<= _ %<imp%> %<p1%>  ; 

"Don't allow derivations of derivations"
: /<= _ Derivations :* Derivations ;

;				! end of Rules
